Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1921
Disciplinary action; considerations.

(1) In determining what type of disciplinary action to impose, the department shall consider:

(a) The gravity of the violation, including the probability that death or serious physical or mental harm will result, the severity of the actual or potential harm, and the extent to which the provisions of applicable statutes, rules, and regulations were violated;

(b) The diligence exercised by the program in identifying or correcting the violation;

(c) The degree of cooperation exhibited by the licensee in the identification, disclosure, and correction of the violation;

(d) Any previous violations committed by the program; and

(e) The financial benefit to the program of committing or continuing the violation.

(2) If the licensee fails to correct a violation or to comply with a particular type of disciplinary action, the department may take additional disciplinary action as described in section 71-1920.

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 84.